North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-01 Names and Boundaries of Counties

11-01-01.
Names and boundaries.

Sections 11-01-02 through 11-01-54 shall be deemed to show the names and boundaries of the several counties of this state, and such names and boundaries shall be and remain as now fixed and determined until changed in the manner provided by law.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0101.

Cross-References.

Counties in North Dakota after it became a state, see N.D. Const., Art. VII, § 3.

Existing boundaries to remain after code takes effect, see N.D.C.C. § 1-02-31.

Collateral References.

Withdrawal of name from petition, for change of county seat, or revocation or withdrawal, and time therefor, 27 A.L.R.2d 604.

11-01-02.
Adams County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range ninety-eight west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the seventh standard parallel; thence east along the seventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range ninety-one west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-one north, range ninety-one west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred thirty-one and one hundred thirty-two to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north range ninety-five west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range ninety-five west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence west along the eighth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range ninety-eight west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-eight and ninety-nine west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0102. Governor’s proclamation after election in 1906. The proclamation is filed in the office of secretary of state. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-03.
Barnes County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range sixty-one west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range fifty-six west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-five and fifty-six to the tenth standard parallel; thence west along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range fifty-six west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges fifty-five and fifty-six west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-three north, range fifty-six west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-three north, range sixty-one west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty north, range sixty-one west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1875, ch. 30, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 11-0103. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-04.
Benson County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range seventy-one west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range sixty-two west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two to a point one thousand three hundred twenty feet, more or less, south of the northeast corner of section twelve, township one hundred fifty-one north, range sixty-two west, the same being the quarter quarter line; thence due west along said quarter quarter line to point where said quarter quarter line intersects the east boundary of the Devils Lake Indian Reservation; thence northerly along said boundary line to the southeast corner of lot five, section ten, township one hundred fifty-one, range sixty-two; thence due west along the south line of said lot five and thence due west on the quarter quarter line to a point where said quarter quarter line intersects the meander line of East Devils Lake; thence southerly along said meander line to the southern extremity of said meander line on said East Devils Lake as re-established by the United States department of the interior in surveys accepted in 1972; thence in a northwesterly direction along said south meander line of East Devils Lake and Devils Lake to the point of intersection of the thirteenth standard parallel with the meander line of Devils Lake in section thirty-one, township one hundred fifty-three north, range sixty-five west; thence west along said thirteenth standard parallel to the intersection of the range line between ranges sixty-five and sixty-six west; thence north along said range line to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range sixty-six west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-three and one hundred fifty-four north to a point on the west meander line of Devils Lake as re-established by the United States department of the interior in surveys accepted in 1972; thence in a northwesterly direction along said meander line to a point where said meander line intersects the center of Mauvaise Coulee; thence in a northwesterly direction along the center of Mauvaise Coulee to a point where said centerline intersects the range line between ranges sixty-six and sixty-seven west; thence north along said range line to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range sixty-seven west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fourteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range seventy-one west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-one and seventy-two west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range seventy-one west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence east along the thirteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range seventy-one west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges seventy-one and seventy-two west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 32, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 11-0104; S.L. 1983, ch. 146, § 1. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department. Maps of United States Geological Survey.

11-01-05.
Billings County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range one hundred two west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range one hundred west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-nine and one hundred west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty north, range one hundred west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-seven and ninety-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range ninety-eight west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence west along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range one hundred two west; thence south along the line between ranges one hundred two and one hundred three west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range one hundred two west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty north, range one hundred two west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges one hundred two and one hundred three west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 67; R.C. 1943, § 11-0105. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-06.
Bottineau County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range eighty-three west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range eighty-one west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty and eighty-one west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range eighty west; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-nine and one hundred sixty north to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range seventy-six west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-five and seventy-six west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range seventy-five west; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range seventy-four west; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range seventy-four west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fifteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range seventy-four west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the international boundary line between the United States and Canada; thence west along the international boundary line to the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-three west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fifteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range eighty-three west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 50, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 11-0106. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-07.
Bowman County.

Beginning at the point where the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana intersects the seventh standard parallel; thence east along the seventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range ninety-nine west of the fifth principal meridian; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-eight and ninety-nine west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range ninety-nine west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence west along the eighth standard parallel to the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana; thence south along said boundary line to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0107. Proclamation of the governor after an election in 1906. The proclamation is filed in the office of the secretary of state. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-08.
Burke County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range ninety-four west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range ninety west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-nine and ninety west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range ninety west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fifteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-nine west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-eight and eighty-nine west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-nine west; thence east along the line between townships one hundred sixty-one and one hundred sixty-two north to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-two north, range eighty-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the international boundary line between the United States and Canada; thence west along the international boundary line to the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range ninety-four west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fifteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range ninety-four west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0108. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-09.
Burleigh County.

Beginning at the intersection of the main channel of the Missouri River with the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range seventy-five west of the fifth principal meridian; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty north, range seventy-five west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence west along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range seventy-five west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range seventy-five west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence west on the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range seventy-nine west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-nine and eighty west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-three north, range seventy-nine west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred forty-two and one hundred forty-three north to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a southerly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1873, ch. 18, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 11-0109. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-10.
Cass County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range fifty-five west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the present main channel of the Red River of the North; thence in a northerly direction along the present main channel of the Red River of the North to the intersection of the present main channel of the Red River of the North with the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north; thence west along the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-three north, range fifty-five west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-five and fifty-six west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range fifty-five west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty north, range fifty-five west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges fifty-five and fifty-six west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1873, ch. 20, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 11-0110; S.L. 1963, ch. 108, § 1. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-11.
Cavalier County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range sixty-four west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range fifty-seven west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range fifty-seven west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fifteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range fifty-seven west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west to the international boundary line between the United States and Canada; thence west along the international boundary line to the line between ranges sixty-four and sixty-five west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-four and sixty-five west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range sixty-four west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fifteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range sixty-four west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges sixty-four and sixty-five west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 37, § 3; 1887, ch. 182, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0111. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-12.
Dickey County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range sixty-six west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the seventh standard parallel; thence east along the seventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range fifty-nine west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-eight and fifty-nine west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range fifty-nine west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence west along the eighth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range sixty-six west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-six and sixty-seven west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1881, ch. 40, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0112. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-13.
Divide County.

Beginning at the point where the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana intersects the line between townships one hundred fifty-nine and one hundred sixty north; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-nine and one hundred sixty north to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range ninety-five west of the fifth principal meridian; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range ninety-five west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fifteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range ninety-five west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the international boundary line between the United States and Canada; thence west along the international boundary line to the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana; thence south along the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0113. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-14.
Dunn County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-seven west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-four west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-three and ninety-four west to the northeast corner of section twenty-five, township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-four west; thence east along a line parallel to and two miles [3.22 kilometers] distant in a northerly direction from the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of section twenty-four, township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-one west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range ninety-one west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence west along the eleventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range ninety-one west; thence continuing north along the range line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a northwesterly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the intersection of the main channel of the Missouri River with the line between ranges ninety-three and ninety-four west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-three and ninety-four west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range ninety-three west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range ninety-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-seven and ninety-eight west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range ninety-seven west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range ninety-seven west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges ninety-seven and ninety-eight west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0114. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-15.
Eddy County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range sixty-seven west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred forty-seven and one hundred forty-eight north to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range sixty-two west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range sixty-two west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range sixty-two west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty north, range sixty-two west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty north, range sixty-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-seven and sixty-eight west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range sixty-seven west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence east along the twelfth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range sixty-seven west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges sixty-seven and sixty-eight to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 15, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0115. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-16.
Emmons County.

Beginning at the point where the seventh standard parallel intersects the main channel of the Missouri River; thence east along the seventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range seventy-four west of the fifth principal meridian; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range seventy-four west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence west along the eighth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range seventy-four west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range seventy-four west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence west along the ninth standard parallel to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a southerly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1879, ch. 11, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 11-0116. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-17.
Foster County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range sixty-seven west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range sixty-two west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-seven north, range sixty-two west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred forty-seven and one hundred forty-eight north to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-seven north, range sixty-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-seven and sixty-eight west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 15, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 11-0117. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-18.
Golden Valley County.

Beginning at the point where the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana intersects the line between townships one hundred thirty-five and one hundred thirty-six north; thence east along the line between townships one hundred thirty-five and one hundred thirty-six north to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range one hundred five west of the fifth principal meridian; thence north along the line between ranges one hundred four and one hundred five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range one hundred five west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range one hundred three west; thence north along the line between ranges one hundred two and one hundred three west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty north, range one hundred three west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence west along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range one hundred three west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges one hundred two and one hundred three west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range one hundred three west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence west along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range one hundred five west, a point on the boundary line between the states of Montana and North Dakota; thence south along the boundary line between the states of Montana and North Dakota to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0118. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-19.
Grand Forks County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range fifty-six west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence east along the twelfth standard parallel to the main channel of the Red River of the North; thence in a northerly direction along the main channel of the Red River of the North to a point where the line between townships one hundred fifty-four and one hundred fifty-five north intersects the main channel of the Red River of the North; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-four and one hundred fifty-five north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-four north, range fifty-six west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range fifty-six west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence east along the thirteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range fifty-six west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1873, ch. 20, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 11-0119. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-20.
Grant County.

Beginning at a point where the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west of the fifth principal meridian intersects the main channel of the South Fork Cannonball River; thence in a northeasterly direction along the main channel of the South Fork Cannonball River and the Cannonball River to the intersection of the main channel of the Cannonball River with the eighth standard parallel; thence west along the eighth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range eighty-three west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-two and eighty-three west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range eighty-three west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred thirty-three and one hundred thirty-four north to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-four north, range eighty-five west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-four and eighty-five to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range eighty-five west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence west along the ninth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range eighty-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range eighty-eight west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred thirty-seven and one hundred thirty-eight north to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range ninety west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range ninety west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range ninety west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one to the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range ninety west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence east along the eighth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range ninety west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0120. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-21.
Griggs County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range sixty-one west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range fifty-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-seven and fifty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range fifty-eight west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence west along the eleventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range fifty-eight west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges fifty-seven and fifty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range fifty-eight west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range sixty-one west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range sixty-one west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range sixty-one west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1881, ch. 41, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0121. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-22.
Hettinger County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range ninety-seven west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence east along the eighth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range ninety-four west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range ninety-four west; thence east along the line between townships one hundred thirty-one and one hundred thirty-two north to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range ninety-one west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range ninety-one west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence west along the eighth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range ninety-one west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range ninety-one west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence west along the ninth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range ninety-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-seven and ninety-eight west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0122. Proclamation of Governor John Burke after election held in 1906. The proclamation is filed in the office of the secretary of state. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-23.
Kidder County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range seventy-four west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range seventy west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-nine and seventy west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty north, range seventy west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence west along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range seventy west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges sixty-nine and seventy west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range seventy west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence west along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range seventy-four west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range seventy-four west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty north, range seventy-four west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 23; R.C. 1943, § 11-0123. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-24.
LaMoure County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range sixty-six west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence east along the eighth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range fifty-nine west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-eight and fifty-nine west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range fifty-nine west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence west along the ninth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range sixty-six west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-six and sixty-seven west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 24, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0124. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-25.
Logan County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range seventy-three west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence east along the eighth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range sixty-seven west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-six and sixty-seven west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range sixty-seven west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence west along the ninth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range seventy-three west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1873, ch. 18, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 11-0125. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.